Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5154
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Insurers Investment Act, including, but not limited to, establishing standards for qualification as custodians for insurer investments and establishing requirements for custody agreements.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 54;

Laws 2005, LB 119, § 19.